Tennessee, session 114, SB0504.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1.
(a) The desk of house chamber seat number 60 is hereby officially named the
"Legislative Desk of Representative John J. Deberry, Jr."
(b) The chief clerk of the house of representatives, or the chief clerk's designee,
shall design and provide for the installation of a commemorative plaque on the side of
the desk of house chamber seat number 60 to recognize the naming of such desk as the
"Legislative Desk of Representative John J. Deberry, Jr."
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0504
002066
- 1 -